New York, session 2025-2026, A1362.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 23-0101 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding three new subdivisions 4-a, 7-a and 16-a to read as 3 follows: 4 4-a. "Flowback fluid" means liquids produced during initial completion 5 and cleanup of the well or cleanup of a well following refracture or 6 work over of a well. 7 7-a. "High-volume hydraulic fracturing" or "HVHF" means hydraulic 8 fracturing for natural gas extraction using greater than three hundred 9 thousand gallons of water regardless of whether the well is vertical, 10 directional or horizontal. 11 16-a. "Production brine" or "produced water" means liquids co-produced 12 during oil and gas production. 13 § 2. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a new 14 section 23-0315 to read as follows: 15 § 23-0315. Wastewater for road and land spreading; prohibited. 16 Wastewater associated with the production of natural gas using high- 17 volume hydraulic fracturing, including flowback fluid, production brine 18 or produced water, shall not be used for the purpose of road spreading 19 for dust control or de-icing or land spreading. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03841-01-5